North Dakota, session 69, SB2365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-12-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-12-30. Twenty-four seven sobriety program fees.
A criminal justice agency may collect program fees from offenders participating in the
twenty-four seven sobriety program, including fees for twice per day breath alcohol testing,
urine testing, drug patch testing, installation and deactivation fees for remote electronic alcohol
monitoring devices, and remote electronic alcohol monitoring daily fees. A district court judge or
judicial referee may not waive program fees for offenders participating in the twenty - four seven
sobriety program. The criminal justice agency shall pay all program fees into the general fund of
the governing body. The fees may only be applied to twenty-four seven sobriety program
support services, equipment maintenance and replacement, and compliance with the program.
The governing body shall pay any daily fees collected for remote electronic alcohol monitoring
to the twenty-four seven sobriety program fund.
Page No. 1 25.1351.02000